Utah statutes.
53A-1a-503.5.   Status of charter schools.

(1)  Charter schools are:

(a)  considered to be public schools within the state's public education system;

(b)  subject to Subsection 53A-1-401(3); and

(c)  governed by independent boards and held accountable to a legally binding written contractual agreement.

(2)  A charter school may be established by creating a new school or converting an existing public school to charter status.



Amended by Chapter 319, 2008 General Session

